Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.050

Indictment or information—Sufficiency.

The indictment or information is sufficient if it can be understood therefrom—

(1) That it is entitled in a court having authority to receive it;

(2) That it was found by a grand jury or prosecuting attorney of the county in which the court was held;

(3) That the defendant is named, or if his or her name cannot be discovered, that he or she is described by a fictitious name or by reference to a unique genetic sequence of deoxyribonucleic acid, with the statement that his or her real name is unknown;

(4) That the crime was committed within the jurisdiction of the court, except where, as provided by law, the act, though done without the county in which the court is held, is triable therein;

(5) That the crime was committed at some time previous to the finding of the indictment or filing of the information, and within the time limited by law for the commencement of an action therefor;

(6) That the act or omission charged as the crime is clearly and distinctly set forth in ordinary and concise language, without repetition, and in such a manner as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is intended;

(7) The act or omission charged as the crime is stated with such a degree of certainty as to enable the court to pronounce judgment upon a conviction according to the right of the case.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1037; 2000 c 92 s 3; 1891 c 28 s 29; Code 1881 s 1014; 1873 p 226 s 197; 1869 p 242 s 192; RRS s 2065. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1891 c 28 s 20; Code 1881 s 1004; 1873 p 224 s 187; 1869 p 240 s 182; RRS s 2055, now codified as RCW 10.37.052. (ii) 1891 c 28 s 22; Code 1881 s 1006; 1873 p 225 s 189; 1854 p 112 s 61; 1869 p 241 s 184; RRS s 2057, now codified as RCW 10.37.054. (iii) 1891 c 28 s 30; Code 1881 s 1015; 1873 p 227 s 198; 1869 p 242 s 193; RRS s 2066, now codified as RCW 10.37.056.]

NOTES:

Intent—2000 c 92: See note following RCW 10.73.170.